Utah statutes.
9-3-505.   Officer or employee -- No forfeiture of office or employment.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of
this state shall be considered to have forfeited or shall forfeit an officer's
or employee's office or employment by reason of acceptance of membership on
the authority or service on it.
